Nebraska, session 109, LB468.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 8-1120, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-1120 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Securities Act of Nebraska shall be administered by the Director of
Banking and Finance who may employ such deputies, examiners, assistants,
or counsel as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose thereof. The
employment of any person for the administration of the act is subject to
section 49-1499.07. The director may delegate to a deputy director or
counsel any powers, authority, and duties imposed upon or granted to the
director under the act, such as may be lawfully delegated under the
common law or the statutes of this state. The director may also employ
special counsel with respect to any investigation conducted by him or her
under the act or with respect to any litigation to which the director is
a party under the act.
(2) A security issued by and representing an interest in or a debt
of, or guaranteed by, any insurance company shall be registered, pursuant
to the provisions of sections 8-1104 to 8-1109, with the Director of
Insurance who shall as to such registrations administer and enforce the
act, and as pertains to the administration and enforcement of such
registration of such securities all references in the act to director
shall mean the Director of Insurance.
(3)(a) It shall be unlawful for the director or any of his or her
employees to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with
or obtained by the director and which is not made public. Neither the
director nor any of his or her employees shall disclose any confidential
information except among themselves, when necessary or appropriate in a
proceeding, examination, or investigation under the act, or as authorized
in subdivision (3)(b) of this subsection. No provision of the act shall
either create or derogate from any privilege which exists at common law
or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a
subpoena directed to the director or any of his or her employees.
-2-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(b)(i) In administering the act, the director may also:
(A) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government
officials, including, but not limited to, the securities administrator of
a foreign state and the Securities and Exchange Commission, or self-
regulatory organizations, to share resources, standardized or uniform
methods or procedures, and documents, records, and information; or
(B) Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by
other government officials, including, but not limited to, the securities
administrator of a foreign state and the Securities and Exchange
Commission, or self-regulatory organizations.
(ii) For purposes of this subdivision, foreign state means any state
of the United States, other than the State of Nebraska, any territory of
the United States, including Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust
Territory of the Pacific Islands, or the Virgin Islands, and the District
of Columbia.
(4) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and
prescribe forms to carry out the act. No rule and regulation may be
adopted and promulgated or form may be prescribed unless the director
finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest
or for the protection of investors and consistent with the purposes
fairly intended by the policy and provisions of the act. In adopting and
promulgating rules and regulations and prescribing forms the director may
cooperate with the securities administrators of the other states and the
Securities and Exchange Commission with a view to effectuating the policy
of the Securities Act of Nebraska to achieve maximum uniformity in the
form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports
wherever practicable. All rules and regulations and forms of the director
shall be published and made available to any person upon request.
(5) No provision of the act imposing any liability shall apply to
any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule and
regulation, form, or order of the director, notwithstanding that the rule
-3-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
and regulation or form may later be amended or rescinded or be determined
by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.
(6) Every hearing in an administrative proceeding shall be public
unless the director in his or her discretion grants a request joined in
by all the respondents that the hearing be conducted privately.
(7)(a) The Securities Act Cash Fund is created. All filing fees,
registration fees, and all other fees and all money collected by or paid
to the director under any of the provisions of the act shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund, except that registration
fees collected by or paid to the Director of Insurance pursuant to the
provisions of the act shall be credited to the Department of Insurance
Cash Fund. The Securities Act Cash Fund shall be used for the purpose of
administering and enforcing the provisions of the act, except that
transfers may be made to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature and distributions to counties may be made as provided in
subdivision (7)(c) of this section. Any money in the Securities Act Cash
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine thirty-four
million dollars from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on
or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-three
twenty-eight million dollars from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the
General Fund on or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall
transfer twenty-three twenty-eight million dollars from the Securities
Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2028, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
-4-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State
Treasurer shall transfer twenty-three twenty-eight million dollars from
the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30,
2029, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer shall distribute
five million dollars annually from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the
counties proportionately in the proportion that the population of each
county bears to the entire state, as shown by the last federal decennial
census.
(8) A document is filed when it is received by the director. The
director shall keep a register of all applications for registration and
registration statements which are or have ever been effective under the
Securities Act of Nebraska and all denial, suspension, or revocation
orders which have ever been entered under the act. The register shall be
open for public inspection. The information contained in or filed with
any registration statement, application, or report may be made available
to the public under such conditions as the director may prescribe.
(9) The director may, by rule and regulation or order, authorize or
require the filing of any document required to be filed under the act by
electronic or other means, processes, or systems.
(10) Upon request and at such reasonable charges as he or she shall
prescribe, the director shall furnish to any person photostatic or other
copies, certified under his or her seal of office if requested, of any
entry in the register or any document which is a matter of public record.
In any proceeding or prosecution under the act, any copy so certified
shall be prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry or document
certified.
(11) The director in his or her discretion may honor requests from
interested persons for interpretative opinions.
-5-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Section 33-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-110 (1) County clerks shall receive no fee for the performance of
the following services: For issuing certificates of election; for
performing the duties of clerk of the county board; for taking
acknowledgments of claims against the county; for attesting or certifying
any document authorized by the county board or required by the
departments of the state; or for recording Army or Navy discharges or
furnishing certified copies thereof to be used in connection with any
claim for compensation or disability. A charge of twenty-five cents shall
be made for any other certificate and seal unless otherwise provided. The
fees collected shall be credited to the county general fund.
(2) County clerks shall receive a fee of forty twenty-five dollars
for the entire proceedings of issuing a marriage license, administering
the related oaths or affirmations, and recording a marriage certificate.
An additional fee of fifteen nine dollars shall be made for each
certified copy of a marriage record on file in the office of the county
clerk. Both such fees shall be deposited in the county general fund. It
is the intent of the Legislature to examine the amount of the fees
provided in this subsection at least once every five years beginning in
2030 in order to determine whether such fees should be adjusted.
Sec. 3. Section 60-158, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-158 (1) For each identification inspection conducted by the
patrol, the fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.
(2) For each identification inspection conducted by a county
sheriff, the fee shall be twenty dollars plus mileage at the rate
provided in section 33-117 for each mile in excess of ten miles that was
actually and necessarily traveled in conducting the identification
inspection ten dollars, which shall be paid to the county treasurer and
-6-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
credited to the county sheriff's vehicle inspection account within the
county general fund. It is the intent of the Legislature to examine the
amount of the fee provided in this subsection at least once every five
years beginning in 2030 in order to determine whether such fee should be
adjusted.
Sec. 4. Section 60-3,186, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,186 (1) The department shall annually determine the motor
vehicle tax on each motor vehicle registered pursuant to section 60-3,187
and shall cause a notice of the amount to be delivered to the registrant.
The notice may be delivered to the registrant at the address shown upon
his or her registration certificate or the registrant's most recent
address according to information received by the department from the
National Change of Address program of the United States Postal Service or
delivered electronically to the registrant if the registrant has provided
electronic contact information to the department. The notice shall be
provided on or before the first day of the last month of the registration
period.
(2)(a) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee, registration fee,
sales tax, and any other applicable taxes and fees shall be paid to the
county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor vehicle for the
following registration period. If the motor vehicle being registered has
been transferred as a gift or for a nominal amount, any sales tax owed by
the transferor on the purchase of the motor vehicle shall have been paid
or be paid to the county treasurer prior to the registration of the motor
vehicle for the following registration period.
(b) After retaining two one percent of the motor vehicle tax
proceeds collected for costs incurred by the county treasurer, and after
transferring one percent of the motor vehicle tax proceeds collected to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Vehicle Title and Registration
System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund, the remaining motor vehicle
-7-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
tax proceeds shall be allocated to each county, local school system,
school district, city, and village in the tax district in which the motor
vehicle has situs.
(c)(i) Twenty-one and eight-tenths Twenty-two percent of the
remaining motor vehicle tax proceeds shall be allocated to the county,
(ii) sixty percent shall be allocated to the local school system or
school district, and (iii) eighteen and two-tenths percent shall be
allocated to the city or village, except that (A) if the tax district is
not in a city or village, forty percent shall be allocated to the county,
and (B) in counties containing a city of the metropolitan class, eighteen
and two-tenths percent shall be allocated to the county and twenty-one
and eight-tenths twenty-two percent shall be allocated to the city or
village.
(d) The amount allocated to a local school system shall be
distributed to school districts in the same manner as property taxes.
(3) Proceeds from the motor vehicle tax shall be treated as property
tax revenue for purposes of expenditure limitations, matching of state or
federal funds, and other purposes.
Sec. 5. Section 76-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-901 There is hereby imposed a tax on the grantor executing the
deed as defined in section 76-203 upon the transfer of a beneficial
interest in or legal title to real estate at the rate of two dollars and
seventy-five twenty-five cents for each one thousand dollars value or
fraction thereof. For purposes of sections 76-901 to 76-908, value means
(1) in the case of any deed, not a gift, the amount of the full actual
consideration thereof, paid or to be paid, including the amount of any
lien or liens assumed, and (2) in the case of a gift or any deed with
nominal consideration or without stated consideration, the current market
value of the property transferred. Such tax shall be evidenced by stamps
to be attached to the deed. All deeds purporting to transfer legal title
-8-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
or beneficial interest shall be presumed taxable unless it clearly
appears on the face of the deed or sufficient documentary proof is
presented to the register of deeds that the instrument is exempt under
section 76-902.
Sec. 6. Section 76-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-903 The Tax Commissioner shall design such stamps in such
denominations as in his or her judgment will be the most advantageous to
all persons concerned. When any deed subject to the tax imposed by
section 76-901 is offered for recordation, the register of deeds shall
ascertain and compute the amount of the tax due thereon and shall collect
such amount as a prerequisite to acceptance of the deed for recordation.
If a dispute arises concerning the taxability of the transfer, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed until the disputed tax is
paid. If a disputed tax has been paid, the taxpayer may file for a refund
pursuant to section 76-908. The taxpayer may also seek a declaratory
ruling pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
Department of Revenue. From each two dollars and seventy-five twenty-five
cents of tax collected pursuant to section 76-901, the register of deeds
shall retain one dollar and thirty-five fifty cents to be placed in the
county general fund and shall remit the balance to the State Treasurer
who shall credit ninety ninety-five cents of such amount to the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to the
Site and Building Development Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to
the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund, and twenty-five thirty cents
of such amount to the Behavioral Health Services Fund.
Sec. 7. Section 77-684, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-684 The Property Tax Administrator shall, on or before January 15
each year, establish a tax rate for purposes of taxation against the
taxable value as provided in sections 77-682 and 77-683 at a rate which
-9-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
shall be equal to the total property taxes levied in the state divided by
the total taxable value of all taxable property in the state as certified
pursuant to section 77-1613.01. The date when such tax rate is determined
shall be deemed to be the levy date for the property. The Property Tax
Administrator shall send to each car line company a statement showing the
taxable value, the tax rate, and the amount of the tax and a statement
that such tax is due and payable to the Property Tax Administrator on
January 31 next following the levy thereof. If a car line company feels
aggrieved, such company may, on or before February 15, file an appeal
with the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall act upon the appeal
and shall issue a written order mailed to the company within seven days
after the date of the order. The order may be appealed within thirty days
after the date of the order to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission
in accordance with section 77-5013. The Property Tax Administrator shall
remit the tax collected, less a three-percent collection fee, to the
State Treasurer, and such taxes shall then be distributed to the counties
to the credit of the county general fund in the same proportion that the
total property taxes levied in the county bears to the total property
taxes levied in the state as a whole, as certified pursuant to section
77-1613.01 for distribution among the taxing subdivisions in proportion
to all railroad taxes levied by taxing subdivisions. The collection fee
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund.
Sec. 8. Section 77-912, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-912 The Director of Insurance shall transmit fifty percent of the
taxes paid in conformity with Chapter 44, article 1, and Chapter 77,
article 9, to the State Treasurer, thirty forty percent of such taxes
paid to the General Fund, and ten percent of such taxes paid to the
Mutual Finance Assistance Fund, and ten percent of such taxes paid to the
counties proportionately in the proportion that the population of each
-10-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
county bears to the entire state, as shown by the last federal decennial
census, promptly upon completion of his or her audit and examination and
in no event later than May 1 of each year, except that:
(1) All fire insurance taxes paid pursuant to sections 44-150 and
81-523 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General
Fund;
(2) All workers' compensation insurance taxes paid pursuant to
section 44-150 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Compensation Court Cash Fund; and
(3) Commencing with the premium and related retaliatory taxes for
the taxable year ending December 31, 2001, and for each taxable year
thereafter, all premium and related retaliatory taxes imposed by section
44-150 or 77-908 paid by insurers writing health insurance in this state
shall be remitted to the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Distributive
Fund.
Sec. 9. Section 77-1327, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1327 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that accurate and
comprehensive information be developed by the Property Tax Administrator
and made accessible to the taxing officials and property owners in order
to ensure the uniformity and proportionality of the assessments of real
property valuations in the state in accordance with law and to provide
the statistical and narrative reports pursuant to section 77-5027.
(2) All transactions of real property for which the statement
required in section 76-214 is filed shall be available for development of
a sales file by the Property Tax Administrator. All transactions with
stated consideration of more than one hundred dollars or upon which more
than two dollars and seventy-five twenty-five cents in documentary stamp
taxes are paid shall be considered sales. All sales shall be deemed to be
arm's length transactions unless determined to be otherwise under
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques. The Department of
-11-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
Revenue shall not overturn a determination made by a county assessor
regarding the qualification of a sale unless the department reviews the
sale and determines through the review that the determination made by the
county assessor is incorrect.
(3) The Property Tax Administrator annually shall make and issue
comprehensive assessment ratio studies of the average level of
assessment, the degree of assessment uniformity, and the overall
compliance with assessment requirements for each major class of real
property subject to the property tax in each county. The comprehensive
assessment ratio studies shall be developed in compliance with
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques and shall employ such
statistical analysis as deemed appropriate by the Property Tax
Administrator, including measures of central tendency and dispersion. The
comprehensive assessment ratio studies shall be based upon the sales file
as developed in subsection (2) of this section and shall be used by the
Property Tax Administrator for the analysis of the level of value and
quality of assessment for purposes of section 77-5027 and by the Property
Tax Administrator in establishing the adjusted valuations required by
section 79-1016. Such studies may also be used by assessing officials in
establishing assessed valuations.
(4) For purposes of determining the level of value of agricultural
and horticultural land subject to special valuation under sections
77-1343 to 77-1347.01, the Property Tax Administrator shall annually make
and issue a comprehensive study developed in compliance with
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques to establish the level
of value if in his or her opinion the level of value cannot be developed
through the use of the comprehensive assessment ratio studies developed
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) County assessors and other taxing officials shall electronically
report data on the assessed valuation and other features of the property
assessment process for such periods and in such form and content as the
-12-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
Property Tax Administrator shall deem appropriate. The Property Tax
Administrator shall so construct and maintain the system used to collect
and analyze the data to enable him or her to make intracounty comparisons
of assessed valuation, including school districts and other political
subdivisions, as well as intercounty comparisons of assessed valuation,
including school districts and other political subdivisions. The Property
Tax Administrator shall include analysis of real property sales pursuant
to land contracts and similar transfers at the time of execution of the
contract or similar transfer.
Sec. 10. Section 77-1720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1720 All fees allowed for issuing distress warrants, levy, and
return of the warrants, in the cases above provided, shall be twenty two
dollars for issuing each warrant, one dollar for levy, and mileage at the
rate provided in section 33-117 for county sheriffs for each mile
actually and necessarily traveled by such officer on each warrant. When
the officer has more than one warrant in his or her hands for service, he
or she shall charge only for the mileage actually and necessarily
traveled in serving all of the warrants, in which case the mileage so
charged shall be prorated among such warrants. Commission shall be
allowed in addition on all taxes collected by distress and sale as
follows: On all sums not exceeding one hundred dollars, ten cents on each
dollar; and on all sums exceeding one hundred dollars, eight cents on
each dollar. All fees, mileage, and commissions shall be taxed to the
parties against whom the distress warrants run and shall be collected as
the original tax. When the taxes are not collected by distress and sale,
the mileage shall be paid as provided in section 33-117. When mileage has
been paid as provided in section 33-117 and the tax, together with all
fees, mileage, and commission are collected, then the amount collected as
mileage shall be paid to the county treasurer with the fees and
commission and credited by the county treasurer to the general fund of
-13-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
the county. It is the intent of the Legislature to examine the amount of
the fees provided in this section at least once every five years
beginning in 2030 in order to determine whether such fees should be
adjusted.
Sec. 11. Section 77-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1804 (1) The county treasurer shall cause the list of real
property subject to sale and accompanying notice to be published once a
week for three consecutive weeks prior to the date of sale, commencing
the first week in February, in a legal newspaper and, in counties having
more than two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, in a daily legal
newspaper of general circulation, published in the English language in
the county, and designated by the county board. The county treasurer
shall also cause to be posted in some conspicuous place in his or her
office a copy of such notice. The treasurer shall assess against each
description the sum of twenty five dollars to defray the expenses of
advertising, which sum shall be added to the total amount due on such
real property and be collected in the same manner as taxes are collected.
(2) The county treasurer shall also forward an electronic copy of
the list of real property subject to sale to the Property Tax
Administrator who shall compile a list for all counties and publish the
compiled list on the website of the Department of Revenue.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to examine the twenty-dollar
fee provided in subsection (1) of this section at least once every five
years beginning in 2030 in order to determine whether such fee should be
adjusted.
Sec. 12. Section 77-2005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2005 (1) In the case of an uncle, aunt, niece, or nephew related
to the deceased by blood or legal adoption, or other lineal descendant of
the same, or the spouse or surviving spouse of any of such persons, the
-14-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
rate of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, thirteen percent
of the clear market value of the property received by each person in
excess of fifteen thousand dollars; and
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, and prior to
July 1, 2025, eleven percent of the clear market value of the property
received by each person in excess of forty thousand dollars; and .
(c) For decedents dying on or after July 1, 2025, one percent of the
clear market value of the property received by each person in excess of
one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) If the clear market value of the beneficial interest is less
than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall not be subject to tax. In addition, any interest
passing to a person described in subsection (1) of this section who is
under twenty-two years of age shall not be subject to tax.
Sec. 13. Section 77-2006, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2006 (1) In all other cases the rate of tax shall be:
(a) For decedents dying prior to January 1, 2023, eighteen percent
of the clear market value of the beneficial interests received by each
person in excess of ten thousand dollars; and
(b) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2023, and prior to
July 1, 2025, fifteen percent of the clear market value of the beneficial
interests received by each person in excess of twenty-five thousand
dollars; and .
(c) For decedents dying on or after July 1, 2025, one percent of the
clear market value of the beneficial interests received by each person in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars.
(2) If the clear market value of the beneficial interest is less
than or equal to the applicable exempt amount under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall not be subject to any tax. In addition, any
-15-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
interest passing to a person who is under twenty-two years of age shall
not be subject to tax.
Sec. 14. Section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6203 (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility
annually shall pay a nameplate capacity tax equal to the total nameplate
capacity of the commissioned renewable energy generation facility
multiplied by a tax rate of six thousand five hundred sixty three
thousand five hundred eighteen dollars per megawatt. On January 1, 2027,
and on each January 1 thereafter, the Department of Revenue shall adjust
the tax rate by the average annual percentage change in the total amount
of property taxes levied statewide over the most recent ten-year period
for which such information is available. If the adjusted tax rate is not
a whole dollar amount, it shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar
amount.
(2) No tax shall be imposed on a renewable energy generation
facility:
(a) Owned or operated by the federal government, the State of
Nebraska, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an individual municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric membership association, or a cooperative; or
(b) That is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002.
(3) No tax levied pursuant to this section shall be construed to
constitute restricted funds as defined in section 13-518 for the first
five years after the renewable energy generation facility is
commissioned.
(4) The presence of one or more renewable energy generation
facilities or supporting infrastructure shall not be a factor in the
assessment, determination of actual value, or classification under
section 77-201 of the real property underlying or adjacent to such
facilities or infrastructure.
-16-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(5)(a) The Department of Revenue shall collect the tax due under
this section.
(b) The tax shall be imposed beginning the first calendar year the
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned. A renewable energy
generation facility that uses wind as the fuel source which was
commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, shall be subject to the tax levied
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 on and after January 1, 2010. The
amount of property tax on depreciable tangible personal property
previously paid on a renewable energy generation facility that uses wind
as the fuel source which was commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, which
is greater than the amount that would have been paid pursuant to sections
77-6201 to 77-6204 from the date of commissioning until January 1, 2010,
shall be credited against any tax due under Chapter 77, and any amount so
credited that is unused in any tax year shall be carried over to
subsequent tax years until fully utilized.
(c)(i) The tax for the first calendar year shall be prorated based
upon the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned.
(ii) In the first year in which a renewable energy generation
facility is taxed or in any year in which additional commissioned
nameplate capacity is added to a renewable energy generation facility,
the taxes on the initial or additional nameplate capacity shall be
prorated for the number of days remaining in the calendar year.
(iii) When a renewable energy generation facility is decommissioned
or made nonoperational by a change in law during a tax year, the taxes
shall be prorated for the number of days during which the renewable
energy generation facility was not decommissioned or was operational.
(iv) When the capacity of a renewable energy generation facility to
produce electricity is reduced but the renewable energy generation
facility is not decommissioned, the nameplate capacity of the renewable
energy generation facility is deemed to be unchanged.
-17-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(6)(a) On March 1 of each year, the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility shall file with the Department of Revenue a report on
the nameplate capacity of the facility for the previous year from January
1 through December 31. All taxes shall be due on April 1 and shall be
delinquent if not paid on a quarterly basis on April 1 and each quarter
thereafter. Delinquent quarterly payments shall draw interest at the rate
provided for in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
(b) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility is liable
for the taxes under this section with respect to the facility, whether or
not the owner of the facility is the owner of the land on which the
facility is situated.
(7) Failure to file a report required by subsection (6) of this
section, filing such report late, failure to pay taxes due, or
underpayment of such taxes shall result in a penalty of five percent of
the amount due being imposed for each quarter the report is overdue or
the payment is delinquent, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten
thousand dollars.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall enforce the provisions of this
section. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this section.
(9) The Department of Revenue shall separately identify the proceeds
from the tax imposed by this section and shall pay all such proceeds over
to the county treasurer of the county where the renewable energy
generation facility is located within thirty days after receipt of such
proceeds.
Sec. 15. Section 77-6815, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6815 (1) Number of new employees, for purposes of subdivisions
(1)(b), (4)(d), (5)(c), and (8)(b)(ii) (8)(b)(iii) of section 77-6831,
means the lesser of:
-18-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(a) The number of equivalent employees that are employed at the
qualified location or locations during a year that are in excess of the
number of equivalent employees during the base year; or
(b) The sum of:
(i) The number of equivalent employees employed full-time at the
qualified location or locations during a year who are not base-year
employees, who meet the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of
this section, and who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least
one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage
for the year of application; and
(ii) The number of equivalent employees who were not employed full-
time at the qualified location during the base year and became employed
full-time at the qualified location after the base year, after
subtracting the hours worked by such employees in the base year, who meet
the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of this section, and
who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least one hundred fifty
percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application.
(2) Number of new employees, for purposes of subdivisions (4)(a)(i)
and (5)(a)(i) of section 77-6831, means the lesser of:
(a) The number of equivalent employees that are employed at the
qualified location or locations during a year that are in excess of the
number of equivalent employees during the base year; or
(b) The sum of:
(i) The number of equivalent employees employed full-time at the
qualified location or locations during a year who are not base-year
employees, who meet the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of
this section, and who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least
ninety percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year
of application; and
(ii) The number of equivalent employees who were not employed full-
-19-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
time at the qualified location during the base year and became employed
full-time at the qualified location after the base year, after
subtracting the hours worked by such employees in the base year, who meet
the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of this section, and
who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least ninety percent of
the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application.
(3) Number of new employees, for purposes of subdivisions (4)(a)(ii)
and (5)(a)(ii) of section 77-6831, means the lesser of:
(a) The number of equivalent employees that are employed at the
qualified location or locations during a year that are in excess of the
number of equivalent employees during the base year; or
(b) The sum of:
(i) The number of equivalent employees employed full-time at the
qualified location or locations during a year who are not base-year
employees, who meet the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of
this section, and who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least
seventy-five percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for
the year of application; and
(ii) The number of equivalent employees who were not employed full-
time at the qualified location during the base year and became employed
full-time at the qualified location after the base year, after
subtracting the hours worked by such employees in the base year, who meet
the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of this section, and
who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least seventy-five
percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application.
(4) Number of new employees, for purposes of subdivisions (4)(a)
(iii), (4)(e), (5)(a)(iii), and (5)(d) of section 77-6831, means the
lesser of:
(a) The number of equivalent employees that are employed at the
qualified location or locations during a year that are in excess of the
-20-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
number of equivalent employees during the base year; or
(b) The sum of:
(i) The number of equivalent employees employed full-time at the
qualified location or locations during a year who are not base-year
employees, who meet the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of
this section, and who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least
seventy percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the
year of application; and
(ii) The number of equivalent employees who were not employed full-
time at the qualified location during the base year and became employed
full-time at the qualified location after the base year, after
subtracting the hours worked by such employees in the base year, who meet
the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of this section, and
who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least seventy percent of
the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application.
(5) Number of new employees, for all other purposes, except as
otherwise provided in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, means the lesser of:
(a) The number of equivalent employees that are employed at the
qualified location or locations during a year that are in excess of the
number of equivalent employees during the base year; or
(b) The sum of:
(i) The number of equivalent employees employed full-time at the
qualified location or locations during a year who are not base-year
employees, who meet the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of
this section, and who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least
the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application;
and
(ii) The number of equivalent employees who were not employed full-
time at the qualified location during the base year and became employed
full-time at the qualified location after the base year, after
subtracting the hours worked by such employees in the base year, who meet
-21-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
the health coverage requirement of subsection (7) of this section, and
who are paid compensation at a rate equal to at least the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application.
(6) For employees who work both at a qualified location and also
perform services for the taxpayer at other nonqualified locations, they
will be included in determining the number of new employees if more than
fifty percent of the time for which they are compensated is spent at the
qualified location. For any year other than the base year, employees who
work at the qualified location fifty percent or less of the time for
which they are compensated are not considered employed at the qualified
location. For employees who work both at a qualified location and also
perform services for the taxpayer at the employee's Nebraska residence,
the time for which an employee is compensated for services performed at
the employee's Nebraska residence will be considered spent at the
qualified location.
(7) An employee meets the health coverage requirement if the
taxpayer offers to that employee, for that year, the opportunity to
enroll in minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-sponsored
plan, as those terms are defined and described in section 5000A of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such
section.
(8) For purposes of this section, employed full-time means that the
employee is a full-time employee as defined and described in section
4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the
regulations for such section.
Sec. 16. Section 77-6831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6831 (1) A taxpayer shall be entitled to the sales and use tax
incentives contained in subsection (2) of this section if the taxpayer:
(a) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new employees at the
-22-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period; or
(b) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least two hundred
fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end
of the ramp-up period. ; or
(c) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least fifty million dollars at the qualified location or locations before
the end of the ramp-up period. To receive incentives under this
subdivision, the taxpayer must meet the following conditions:
(i) The average compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the
qualified location or locations for each year of the performance period
must equal at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide
average hourly wage for the year of application;
(ii) The taxpayer must offer to its employees who constitute full-
time employees as defined and described in section 4980H of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such section,
at the qualified location or locations for each year of the performance
period, the opportunity to enroll in minimum essential coverage under an
eligible employer-sponsored plan, as those terms are defined and
described in section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and the regulations for such section; and
(iii) The taxpayer must offer a sufficient package of benefits as
described in subdivision (1)(j) of section 77-6828.
(2) A taxpayer meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall be entitled to the following sales and use tax incentives:
(a) A refund of all sales and use taxes paid under the Local Option
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment
Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 from the date of
the complete application through the meeting of the required levels of
employment and investment for all purchases, including rentals, of:
(i) Qualified property used at the qualified location or locations;
-23-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(ii) Property, excluding motor vehicles, based in this state and
used in both this state and another state in connection with the
qualified location or locations except when any such property is to be
used for fundraising for or for the transportation of an elected
official;
(iii) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson
after appointment as a purchasing agent of the owner of the improvement
to real estate when such property is incorporated into real estate at the
qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty
percent of the contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax;
(iv) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson
after appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such
property is annexed to, but not incorporated into, real estate at the
qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax that were annexed to real
estate; and
(v) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is
both (A) incorporated into real estate at the qualified location or
locations and (B) annexed to, but not incorporated into, real estate at
the qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty
percent of the contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax; and
(b) An exemption from all sales and use taxes under the Local Option
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment
Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 on the types of
purchases, including rentals, listed in subdivision (a) of this
subsection for such purchases, including rentals, occurring during each
year of the performance period in which the taxpayer is at or above the
required levels of employment and investment, except that the exemption
-24-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
shall be for the actual materials purchased with respect to subdivisions
(2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section. The Tax Commissioner shall
issue such rules, regulations, certificates, and forms as are appropriate
to implement the efficient use of this exemption.
(3)(a) Upon execution of the agreement, the taxpayer shall be issued
a direct payment permit under section 77-2705.01, notwithstanding the
three million dollars in purchases limitation in subsection (1) of
section 77-2705.01, for each qualified location specified in the
agreement, unless the taxpayer has opted out of this requirement in the
agreement. For any taxpayer who is issued a direct payment permit, until
such taxpayer makes the investment in qualified property and hires the
new employees at the qualified location or locations as specified in
subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer must pay and remit any
applicable sales and use taxes as required by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) If the taxpayer makes the investment in qualified property and
hires the new employees at the qualified location or locations as
specified in subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer shall receive
the sales tax refunds described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
For any year in which the taxpayer is not at the required levels of
employment and investment, the taxpayer shall report all sales and use
taxes owed for the period on the taxpayer's tax return.
(4) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits
for payment of wages to new employees:
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under
this subdivision;
-25-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location in a county in Nebraska with a population of one
hundred thousand or greater, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of
section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under
this subdivision; or
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location or locations within one or more counties in Nebraska
that each have a population of less than one hundred thousand, and at
which the majority of the business activities conducted are described in
subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be
entitled to a credit equal to six percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees. For purposes of meeting the
ten-employee requirement of this subdivision, the number of new employees
shall be multiplied by two. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid
to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision;
(b) If a taxpayer hires at least twenty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to five percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the
average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred percent of
-26-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application.
The credit shall equal seven percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of the
new employees equals at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. The credit
shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees
equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million
dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to five
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at least one
hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the
year of application. The credit shall equal seven percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the
average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred fifty
percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application. The credit shall equal nine percent times the average wage
of new employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of
the new employees equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in
excess of one million dollars paid to any one employee during the year
shall be excluded from the calculations under this subdivision;
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least
two hundred fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations
-27-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
before the end of the ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a
credit equal to seven percent times the average wage of new employees
times the number of new employees if the average wage of the new
employees equals at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. The credit
shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees
equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million
dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision; or
(e) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one
million dollars and hires at least five new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the number
of new employees and investment are at a qualified location within an
economic redevelopment area, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to six percent times the average wage of new employees times the
number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees equals
at least seventy percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage
for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid
to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision,
economic redevelopment area means an area in which (i) the average rate
of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent
federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is
at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period and (ii) the average poverty rate in the
area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts
or federal census block group or block groups in the area.
(5) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits
-28-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
for new investment:
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations;
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location in a county in Nebraska with a population of one
hundred thousand or greater, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of
section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations unless the cumulative investment exceeds ten
million dollars, in which case the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to seven percent of the investment made in qualified property at
the qualified location or locations; or
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location or locations within one or more counties in Nebraska
that each have a population of less than one hundred thousand, and at
which the majority of the business activities conducted are described in
subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be
entitled to a credit equal to four percent of the investment made in
qualified property at the qualified location or locations unless the
cumulative investment exceeds ten million dollars, in which case the
-29-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven percent of the
investment made in qualified property at the qualified location or
locations. For purposes of meeting the ten-employee requirement of this
subdivision, the number of new employees shall be multiplied by two;
(b) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least
two hundred fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations
before the end of the ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a
credit equal to seven percent of the investment made in qualified
property at the qualified location or locations; or
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one
million dollars and hires at least five new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the number
of new employees and investment are at a qualified location within an
economic redevelopment area, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to four percent of the investment made in qualified property at the
qualified location or locations. For purposes of this subdivision,
economic redevelopment area means an area in which (i) the average rate
of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent
federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is
at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period and (ii) the average poverty rate in the
area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts
or federal census block group or block groups in the area.
-30-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(6)(a) The credit percentages prescribed in subdivisions (4)(a),
(b), (c), and (d) and subdivisions (5)(a), (b), and (c) of this section
shall be increased by one percentage point for wages paid and investments
made at qualified locations in an extremely blighted area. For purposes
of this subdivision, extremely blighted area means an area which, before
the end of the ramp-up period, has been declared an extremely blighted
area under section 18-2101.02.
(b) The credit percentages prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section shall be increased by one percentage point if the taxpayer:
(i) Is a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 and has
been such a corporation for at least one year prior to submitting an
application under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act; and
(ii) Remains a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 for
the duration of the taxpayer's agreement under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
(c) A taxpayer may, if qualified, receive one or both of the
increases provided in this subsection.
(7)(a) The credits prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section shall be allowable for wages paid and investments made during
each year of the performance period that the taxpayer is at or above the
required levels of employment and investment.
(b) The credits prescribed in subsection (5) of this section shall
also be allowable during the first year of the performance period for
investment in qualified property at the qualified location or locations
after the date of the complete application and before the beginning of
the performance period.
(8)(a) Property described in subdivision (8)(c) of this section used
at the qualified location or locations, whether purchased or leased, and
placed in service by the taxpayer after the date of the complete
application, shall constitute separate classes of property and are
eligible for exemption under the conditions and for the time periods
provided in subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
-31-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
(b) A taxpayer shall receive the exemption of property in
subdivision (8)(c) of this section if the taxpayer attains one of the
following employment and investment levels: (i) Cumulative investment in
qualified property of at least five million dollars and the hiring of at
least thirty new employees at the qualified location or locations before
the end of the ramp-up period; or (ii) cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least fifty million dollars at the qualified location or
locations before the end of the ramp-up period, provided the average
compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the qualified location or
locations for the year in which such investment level was attained equals
at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application and the taxpayer offers to its
employees who constitute full-time employees as defined and described in
section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the
regulations for such section, at the qualified location or locations for
the year in which such investment level was attained, the opportunity to
enroll in minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-sponsored
plan, as those terms are defined and described in section 5000A of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such
section; or (iii) cumulative investment in qualified property of at least
two hundred fifty million dollars and the hiring of at least two hundred
fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end
of the ramp-up period. Such property shall be eligible for the exemption
from the first January 1 following the end of the year during which the
required levels were exceeded through the ninth December 31 after the
first year property included in subdivision (8)(c) of this section
qualifies for the exemption, except that for a taxpayer who has filed an
application under NAICS code 518210 for Data Processing, Hosting, and
Related Services and who files a separate sequential application for the
same NAICS code for which the ramp-up period begins with the year
immediately after the end of the previous project's performance period or
-32-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
a taxpayer who has a project qualifying under subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of
section 77-5725 and who files a separate sequential application for NAICS
code 518210 for Data Processing, Hosting, and Related Services for which
the ramp-up period begins with the year immediately after the end of the
previous project's entitlement period, such property described in
subdivision (8)(c)(i) of this section shall be eligible for the exemption
from the first January 1 following the placement in service of such
property through the ninth December 31 after the year the first claim for
exemption is approved.
(c) The following personal property used at the qualified location
or locations, whether purchased or leased, and placed in service by the
taxpayer after the date of the complete application shall constitute
separate classes of personal property:
(i) All personal property that constitutes a data center if the
taxpayer qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this
section;
(ii) Business equipment that is located at a qualified location or
locations and that is involved directly in the manufacture or processing
of agricultural products, including business equipment used primarily for
the capture and compression of carbon dioxide, the manufacturing of
liquid fertilizer or any other chemical applied to agricultural crops, or
the manufacturing of any liquid additive for a farm vehicle fuel if the
taxpayer qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this
section; or
(iii) All personal property if the taxpayer qualifies under
subdivision (8)(b)(ii) (8)(b)(iii) of this section.
(d) In order to receive the property tax exemptions allowed by
subdivision (8)(c) of this section, the taxpayer shall annually file a
claim for exemption with the Tax Commissioner on or before May 1. The
form and supporting schedules shall be prescribed by the Tax Commissioner
and shall list all property for which exemption is being sought under
-33-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
this section. A separate claim for exemption must be filed for each
agreement and each county in which property is claimed to be exempt. A
copy of this form must also be filed with the county assessor in each
county in which the applicant is requesting exemption. The Tax
Commissioner shall determine whether a taxpayer is eligible to obtain
exemption for personal property based on the criteria for exemption and
the eligibility of each item listed for exemption and, on or before
August 1, certify such determination to the taxpayer and to the affected
county assessor.
(9) The taxpayer shall, on or before the receipt or use of any
incentives under this section, pay to the director a fee of one-half
percent of such incentives, except for the exemption on personal
property, for administering the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, except that the fee
on any sales tax exemption may be paid by the taxpayer with the filing of
its sales and use tax return. Such fee may be paid by direct payment to
the director or through withholding of available refunds. A credit shall
be allowed against such fee for the amount of the fee paid with the
application. All fees collected under this subsection shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the ImagiNE Nebraska Cash Fund,
which fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of fees credited
under this subsection and any other money appropriated to the fund by the
Legislature. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Economic
Development and shall be used for administration of the ImagiNE Nebraska
Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 17. Section 77-6833, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6833 (1) If the taxpayer fails to maintain employment and
investment levels at or above the levels required in the agreement for
the entire performance period, all or a portion of the incentives set
-34-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
forth in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be recaptured or disallowed. For
purposes of this section, the average compensation and health coverage
requirements of subdivision (1)(c) of section 77-6831 shall be treated as
a required level of employment for each year of the performance period.
(2) In the case of a taxpayer who has failed to maintain the
required levels of employment or investment for the entire performance
period, any reduction in the personal property tax, any refunds in tax or
exemptions from tax allowed under section 77-6831, and any refunds or
reduction in tax allowed because of the use of a credit allowed under
section 77-6831 shall be partially recaptured from either the taxpayer,
the owner of the improvement to real estate, or the qualified employee
leasing company, and any carryovers of credits shall be partially
disallowed. The amount of the recapture for each benefit shall be a
percentage equal to the number of years the taxpayer did not maintain the
required levels of investment or employment divided by the number of
years of the performance period multiplied by the refunds, exemptions, or
reductions in tax allowed, reduction in personal property tax, credits
used, and the remaining carryovers. In addition, the last remaining year
of personal property tax exemption shall be disallowed for each year the
taxpayer did not maintain the qualified location or locations at or above
the required levels of employment or investment.
(3) If the taxpayer receives any refund, exemption, or reduction in
tax to which the taxpayer was not entitled or which was in excess of the
amount to which the taxpayer was entitled, the refund, exemption, or
reduction in tax shall be recaptured separate from any other recapture
otherwise required by this section. Any amount recaptured under this
subsection shall be excluded from the amounts subject to recapture under
other subsections of this section.
(4) Any refunds, exemptions, or reduction in tax due, to the extent
required to be recaptured, shall be deemed to be an underpayment of the
tax and shall be immediately due and payable. When tax benefits were
-35-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
received in more than one year, the tax benefits received in the most
recent year shall be recovered first and then the benefits received in
earlier years up to the extent of the required recapture.
(5)(a) Any personal property tax that would have been due except for
the exemption allowed under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, to the extent it
becomes due under this section, shall be considered delinquent and shall
be immediately due and payable to the county or counties in which the
property was located when exempted.
(b) All amounts received by a county under this section shall be
allocated to each taxing unit levying taxes on tangible personal property
in the county in the same proportion that the levy on tangible personal
property of such taxing unit bears to the total levy of all of such
taxing units.
(6) Notwithstanding any other limitations contained in the laws of
this state, collection of any taxes deemed to be underpayments by this
section shall be allowed for a period of three years after the end of the
performance period or three calendar years after the benefit was allowed,
whichever is later.
(7) Any amounts due under this section shall be recaptured
notwithstanding other allowable credits and shall not be subsequently
refunded under any provision of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act unless the
recapture was in error.
(8) The recapture required by this section shall not occur if the
failure to maintain the required levels of employment or investment was
caused by an act of God or a national emergency.
Sec. 18. Section 81-12,146, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,146 (1) The Site and Building Development Fund is created. The
fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include
revenue from transfers by the Legislature, grants, private contributions,
repayment of loans, and all other sources. The Department of Economic
-36-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
Development, as part of its comprehensive business development strategy,
shall administer the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Site
and Building Development Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer five million
dollars from the General Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund
for fiscal year 2022-23 and five million dollars from the General Fund to
the Site and Building Development Fund for fiscal year 2023-24. Such
money shall be placed in a subaccount of the Site and Building
Development Fund and earmarked for use to fund large shovel-ready
commercial and industrial sites developed under the Municipal Inland Port
Authority Act.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five
hundred thousand dollars from the Site and Building Development Fund for
fiscal year 2024-25 to the department to enter into one or more contracts
to conduct a comprehensive study or studies to identify and evaluate
large commercial and industrial sites in Nebraska that have the potential
to attract major investment and employment opportunities. The study shall
include consideration of super sites that encompass between five hundred
and one thousand acres and mega sites that encompass more than one
thousand acres. At least one proposed site shall be located west of the
one hundredth meridian in Nebraska. The contracts shall be awarded based
on a competitive selection process as determined by the department. The
studies shall be completed no later than December 15, 2024.
(b) The study shall assess the potential geographic locations; the
infrastructure assets that would be required for each site, including
highway, rail, and air transportation, and utilities such as water,
wastewater treatment, electrical power, and natural gas; the population
within fifty miles of each site and whether such population would be
-37-

LB468 LB468
2025 2025
sufficient to provide an adequate workforce for such site; and the
appropriate level of state investment necessary to position Nebraska as a
nationally or globally competitive location for site selection targeting
various sectors, including, but not limited to, advanced manufacturing,
trade, bioscience, agribusiness, warehousing and supply chain logistics,
technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, military support, and
life sciences. Such identified state investment levels may include, but
are not limited to, land acquisition costs and infrastructure
investments. The purpose of the study is to provide strategic insights
that will enable the state to attract major investment and employment
opportunities in order to support the growth of transformational
industries within Nebraska.
(c) The Director of Economic Development shall appoint an advisory
committee comprised of representatives of Nebraska economic development
organizations, equally representing each of Nebraska's three
congressional districts, to assist the department in identifying the
location of potential and preferred super sites and mega sites.
Sec. 19. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 20. Original sections 33-110, 60-158, 60-3,186, 76-901,
76-903, 77-684, 77-912, 77-1327, 77-1720, 77-1804, and 81-12,146, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 8-1120, 77-2005, 77-2006,
77-6203, 77-6815, 77-6831, and 77-6833, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 21. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-2701.54 and 77-2704.62, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 22. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-38-